Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-1023
Identification or marking; violation;
penalty.

Any employee or officer of the State of Nebraska
who operates or has under his or her control any state-owned vehicle,
any other motor vehicle acquired by the State of Nebraska, or any unit of road machinery which is not numbered, lettered, or marked as
required by section 81-1021, or who violates any of the other provisions of
sections 60-3,105, 60-3,106, 81-1021, and 81-1022 shall be deemed guilty of
official misconduct in office for a palpable omission of duty and upon conviction
thereof shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor. The court shall have the power to add to the judgment that
any officer so convicted shall be removed from office or employment.

Laws 1939, c. 94, § 4, p. 411;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 60-1203;

R.S.1943, § 60-1004;

Laws 1978, LB 748, § 34;

Laws 1987, LB 22, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-1004;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 486;

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 282;

Laws 2012, LB779, § 12.